District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1942

Establishment of D.C. General Hospital Fund; deposit and transfer of monies; billing receipts; capital debt service; federal provisions not affected.

Repealed.

History

May 13, 1977, D.C. Law 1-134, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 406
Nov. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 10-65, § 301(d), 40 DCR 7351
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212,§ 402, 43 DCR 4962

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-242.
1973 Ed., § 32-1342.

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 44-1901.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 1-134, title IV, § 401, eff. May 13, 1977, added §§ 32-241 to 32-243 [1981 Ed.].

D.C. Law 11-212, title IV, § 402 ( 43 DCR 4962), eff. April 9, 1997, provided: “The D.C. General Hospital Commission Act, effective May 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-134; D.C. Code § 32-201 et seq. [1981 Ed.]), is repealed.”

Title V, § 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212, provided: “(c) Section 402 shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to section 204(h).”